Georgia, session 2025_26, HB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Lower Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority, approved May 5,
2006 (Ga. L. 2006, p. 4422), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 28, 2010 (Ga.
L. 2010, p. 3570) and an Act approved April 11, 2012 (Ga. L. 2012, p. 5050), is hereby
repealed in its entirety.
SECTION 2.
Any and all assets of the Lower Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority shall devolve
automatically and without further action to Randolph County, Georgia. The Board of
Commissioners of Randolph County, Georgia, is authorized to execute any deeds or
H. B. 380
- 1 -

LC 62 0018/AP
instruments of conveyance required to place title of such assets into the name of Randolph
County and is authorized to do so in the name of the Lower Chattahoochee Regional Airport
Authority. The obligations of the Lower Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority shall be
transferred to and assumed by Randolph County, Georgia, by such instruments as may be
required to maintain the same. The Board of Commissioners of Randolph County, Georgia,
is authorized to execute any such instruments required to transfer such obligations into the
name of Randolph County and is authorized to do so in the name of the Lower
Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 380
- 2 -